waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
aižė/NOXYdjkpv
apsiblaivė/Y
apsidairė/NXY
ardė/OPRSXYabdefijkpquw
atsibastė/NXY
atsikvapstė/NXY
austė/NXYe
badė/OSXYadefijklpqrwx
baidė/OSXYbcdefjklpqrwx
baldė/OPRSXYdpqsvx
bandė/OSXYdfprv
barstė/OSXYacdefhjlmnopqrtvx
besiarkė/Y
besibastė/Y
besiblaivė/Y
besiblandė/Y
besidairė/Y
besidalbstė/Y
besikvapstė/Y
besimaivė/Y
besimangė/Y
besimarkstė/Y
besiniaukstė/Y
besiraivė/Y
besirąžė/Y
besislambė/Y
besistaipė/Y
besisulpstė/Y
besitalkstė/Y
besitarstė/Y
besitvankstė/Y
besivaipė/Y
besičiaupė/Y
besičiulpstė/Y
besišaipė/Y
besiūkstė/Y
blaškė/OSXYdepqruw
braidė/OSXYabdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
braižė/OSXYacdefhjklmnopqrstvwx
brinkė/NXY
bugdė/NXYdgjkl
cypdė/NXY
daigstė/NXYabcdjkl
daigė/NXYk
dangstė/OSXYabefjlmnvx
darkė/OSXYdekpqw
dažė/OSXYadefhjlmpqrtvx
dildė/NXYadefhikmpqrtw
drabstė/OSXYadefjklmprtvwx
draibstė/NXY
draikė/OSXYadefjklmpqrvx
draskė/OSXYacdefijkmopqrtuvw
dribdė/NXY
durstė/NXYdfk
dėstė/NOXYdejkpw
džiaustė/NOXYadefjkpw
ganė/NOXYabcdefijlmnoqrx
gaubstė/NOXYl
gildė/NXYk
gimdė/NOXYbdfjrv
girdė/NOXYadefhjklmv
glabstė/NOXY
glaistė/NOXYaefhkltvwx
glamžė/NOXYafkmw
glaubstė/NXY
glaudė/OPRSXYjkvwx
glaustė/NOXYr
gliaudė/NOXYdfjv
globstė/NXY
glostė/OSXYadefhijklmnpruvwx
gnaibė/NOXYadefjkl
gniaužė/NOPRXYabdfjklmpwx
gniuždė/NXYk
gobstė/NOXYa
graibstė/OSXYabcdefhijkmnpqrvw
graibė/OSXYadefjkmnrv
graižė/NXYej
gramdė/NXYadejkq
grandė/NOXYadefjkq
grasė/NXYbcefj
grobstė/NOXYadjv
grumdė/NOXYdefk
grąžė/NOXYjk
grėbstė/NXYadefk
guldė/NOXYcdefgjkorvw
gundė/NOXYcfjkrw
gvaldė/NXYd
gvildė/NXY
gydė/OSXYabdefjklmpqrx
imstė/PRSXYr
irstė/NOXYfr
išsibastė/NXY
išsiblaivė/Y
išsiblandė/NXY
išsidairė/NXY
išsivaipė/NXY
ižė/NXY
jodė/PRSXYdefilr
jukdė/NXYj
junkė/NOXYbce
juostė/NXY
kaitė/OPRSXYcefjklorx
kaišė/NOPXYadefjklmpr
kalstė/NOXYk
kamšė/NOXYacfjklmwx
kardė/NOXYl
kargė/NXYl
karpė/NOXYacdefjkmpqrw
kaustė/NOXYafhjklr
kildė/NXY
kinkė/NOXYcdefjkloprw
kiurdė/NXYi
klaipė/NOXYdk
klastė/OPRSXYacdefhijklmpqruw
kliudė/NXYbcfkl
klostė/OPRSXYabcdehjklmnqwx
klupdė/NXYfk
klykdė/NXY
knaibė/NXYbdf
knaisė/OSXYabdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
kniausė/PRSXYcor
kniubdė/NXYk
kraikė/NXYadfl
kraipė/OSXYdfkpruv
kramtė/OSXYadefhjklq
krapštė/OPRSXYabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
kratė/OPRSXYabcdefhjklnpqruvwx
kraustė/NOXYabcdeghiklmnopqstwx
kriaušė/NXY
krikdė/NOXYdfk
kulstė/NXY
kurpė/NPRXYkw
kurstė/NXYcfjk
laidė/OSXYjklwx
laigė/NXYf
laikė/OSXYbdefhijklnpqrstuvwx
laižė/OSXYabdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lakstė/OPRSXYadefiklnpqrv
lamdė/OSXYadfijklmpuwx
lamstė/NXY
lamžė/NXY
landė/NXYdf
lankstė/OPRSXYabcdefhijklnptuvwx
lankė/OSXYabfjmn
lasė/NOXYdjkw
laupė/OPRSXYabdeijmnp
likdė/NXY
lipdė/NOXYabdejklqvwx
lipė/NXY
lodė/NXYk
lopė/NOXYafklwx
lydė/NOXYabcdefhjklmnoprtuvwx
maigė/NOXYadfjklmw
mainė/OSXYabcdfhijkmnoprtw
maišė/OSXYcdfhijkloprtvwx
maldė/NOXYaefh
malžė/NXY
mankė/NOXYdk
manė/NOXYcdefhijklmopqtuvx
mastė/NOXYdekw
maudė/OPSXYadefhklpqrv
maukė/PRSXYbdejklnqvwx
maustė/NOXYefjklwx
mazgė/NOXYbdjkl
migdė/NOXYfkl
mindė/NOXYadefjklpq
minkė/NOXYdjkl
mirkė/NOXYbcdefjklr
mišė/NXY
mokė/OSXYacdfijpqrtuvw
murgdė/NOXYdp
murkdė/NXYclv
mąstė/NOXYadfhkmw
mėtė/OPRSXYacdefhijklmpqruvw
nardė/OSXYdfv
narstė/NXYdkl
naršė/NOXYdfkrvx
nebesiarkė/Y
nebesibastė/Y
nebesiblaivė/Y
nebesiblandė/Y
nebesidairė/Y
nebesidalbstė/Y
nebesikvapstė/Y
nebesimaivė/Y
nebesimangė/Y
nebesimarkstė/Y
nebesiniaukstė/Y
nebesiraivė/Y
nebesirąžė/Y
nebesislambė/Y
nebesistaipė/Y
nebesisulpstė/Y
nebesitalkstė/Y
nebesitarstė/Y
nebesitvankstė/Y
nebesivaipė/Y
nebesičiaupė/Y
nebesičiulpstė/Y
nebesišaipė/Y
nebesiūkstė/Y
nesiarkė/Y
nesibastė/Y
nesiblaivė/Y
nesiblandė/Y
nesidairė/Y
nesidalbstė/Y
nesikvapstė/Y
nesimaivė/Y
nesimangė/Y
nesimarkstė/Y
nesiniaukstė/Y
nesiraivė/Y
nesirąžė/Y
nesislambė/Y
nesistaipė/Y
nesisulpstė/Y
nesitalkstė/Y
nesitarstė/Y
nesitvankstė/Y
nesivaipė/Y
nesičiaupė/Y
nesičiulpstė/Y
nesišaipė/Y
nesiūkstė/Y
niurdė/NXY
niurkė/NOPXYdefjklr
nusibastė/NXY
nusiblaivė/NXY
nusiblandė/NXY
nusivaipė/NXY
nusišaipė/NXY
paistė/NXYfjk
paisė/NXYek
paišė/OSXYacdefhjklopqrtv
parsibastė/NXY
pasibastė/NXY
pasidairė/NXY
pasimaivė/NXY
pasiniaukstė/NXY
pasiraivė/NXY
pasirąžė/NXY
pasivaipė/NXY
pasičiaupė/NXY
pasišaipė/NXY
pašė/NOXYdfkrw
pelnė/OSXYelqrx
pildė/OPRSXYbdfhjlprtvx
pilstė/NXYcdejkl
pjaustė/OSXYacdefjklmoqrvw
pjudė/NXYdfk
plaikstė/OPRSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
plaukė/NPXYabcdefghijkl
plikė/NOXYadelmpx
plukdė/OSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
prapuldė/NXY
prasibastė/NXY
prasiblaivė/NXY
prasiblandė/NXY
prašė/OSXYcdfhjklnoprtvwx
priešpastatė/NXY
prisibastė/NXY
prisivaipė/NXY
prisišaipė/NXY
purtė/OPRSXYadefjkqrvw
pustė/OSXYabcdefjklpr
pydė/NXY
pykdė/NXYcfjkl
pūdė/NXYadfhk
pūkštė/NPXYe
raikė/NXYefjk
raitė/OSXYbdfklnprwx
raizgė/NOXYabdejklpw
raižė/OSXYabcdfijklmopqruvwx
ramdė/NOXYekq
ramstė/NOXYfklr
rangė/NOXYdkoprtvwx
rantė/NXYcdefkl
raukė/OPRSXYefklrwx
raustė/NXY
raškė/NOXYdefjkqrw
rašė/OSXYabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
rikdė/NOXYikw
rydė/NXYjk
rėkdė/NOXY
rėžė/PRSXYabcdehijklmnopqtuwx
rūkė/NOXYadefghijklmprvwx
sagstė/NOXYbejklnqwx
saikstė/PRSXY
saistė/NXYk
sakė/OSXYabcdefhjklmnorvwx
saldė/NXY
samdė/NOXYefjkqrsw
samstė/NOXYdekp
siaustė/NOXY
siulpstė/NOXY
siundė/NOXYl
siurbstė/NXY
siūlė/OSXYcfjorv
skabė/NOXYdefjkr
skaidė/OSXYdkpw
skaitė/OPRSXYbcdefhjklmnoqrtvx
skaldė/OSXYabcdefghijkmopruvw
skardė/NXY
skirstė/OPRSXYdefhjkprtuw
sklaidė/OSXYdfhipru
sklaistė/NXY
sklambė/NXY
sklandė/NXYef
sklastė/NXY
skliaudė/PRSXYabkmnw
skliaustė/NXY
skraidė/NXYf
skvarbė/NXYk
slankė/NXY
slapstė/OSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
slapė/NXY
slaugė/NXYadf
slugdė/NXYek
smaigstė/OPRSXYejkl
smaigė/NXYejk
smaukė/NOPXYbeflnqrx
smukdė/NXYek
spandė/NXYf
spjaudė/NOXYafjr
springdė/NXY
stabdė/OSXYafjklrw
stingdė/NXYk
stumdė/OPRSXYadefhijkmpqruw
sunkstė/NXY
susibastė/NXY
susiūkstė/NXY
svarstė/NXYaefhjk
taikstė/OPRSXYw
taisė/OSXYabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
tampė/OSXYabdefijklmpruvw
tardė/NXYd
taupė/NOXYfjkrvw
tašė/NOXYaefijklmq
tebesibastė/Y
tebesiblandė/Y
tebesidalbstė/Y
tebesimaivė/Y
tebesimarkstė/Y
tebesiraivė/Y
tebesislambė/Y
tebesisulpstė/Y
tebesitarstė/Y
tebesivaipė/Y
tebesičiulpstė/Y
tebesiūkstė/Y
tesiarkė/Y
tesiblaivė/Y
tesidairė/Y
tesikvapstė/Y
tesimangė/Y
tesiniaukstė/Y
tesirąžė/Y
tesistaipė/Y
tesitalkstė/Y
tesitvankstė/Y
tesičiaupė/Y
tesišaipė/Y
tildė/NXYefjlrvx
tirpė/NXYk
tramdė/OSXYajkw
traukė/PRSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrvwx
trukdė/OSXYfklw
tvankė/NXY
tvarkė/OSXYaefhkmqrtuvw
tvilkė/NOXYdeq
tąsė/OSXYadfjklmrw
uostė/NOXYadfjkmvw
vaisė/NOXYcdjlx
valgė/OSXYacdefhijklmnpqrtvw
valė/OSXYadefikmpqruvw
varpė/NOXYdkw
vartė/OSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
varžė/OSXYdefkrw
vilkstė/NXY
virkdė/NOXYefij
vėtė/NXYdj
čiaužė/NOPXYcdefghjklr
šaudė/OSXYabcdfijkmnpruw
šlaistė/PRSXY
šliaukė/NPXYk
šluostė/OSXYadefhkmpqrw
šmaižė/NXYr
žabaldė/NXY
žangstė/NXY
žargdė/NXY
žargė/NOXY
želdė/NXY
žildė/NXYik
žiodė/NXYdi
žnaibė/NOXYfjkl
žvalgė/OSXYadmrw
